parSem/xip/archive/simple/english/FST/src/feat-sem1.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 additional semantic features (Experiencer_subj frame)
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 13-Apr-2006
!#		- derived from former files by C. Brun
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -s LEX.fst -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l add-features.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 
!#
!# [1]: file FORSEM/add-semantics.xfst 
!# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
!# lexical categories
+Adj +Adv +NAdj +Noun +Verb 

!# added features:
+f_exper_subj	! words which belong to the Experiencer_subj frame
+f_partpas

^^ ! separator (must be put between lexical tags and added features !)


!# =============================================================================================
LEXICON ROOT

abhor+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
abhorrence+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
abominate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
adoration+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
adore+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
afraid+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
agitate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
agitated+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
agonize+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
alarm+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
alarmed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
amuse+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
amused+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
anxious+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
apprehensive+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
ashame+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
ashamed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
aspire+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
astonish+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
astonished+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
astound+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
astounded+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
baffle+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
baffled+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
bewilder+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
bewildered+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
bore+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
bored+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
chagrin+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
compassion+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
concern+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
concerned+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
covet+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
covetous+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
crave+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
deject+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
dejected+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
delight+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
delight+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
delight+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
delighted+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
depress+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
depressed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
desire+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
despair+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
despair+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
desperation+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
despise+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
detect+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
detest+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
detestation+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
devastate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
devastated+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
discern+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
discomfit+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
discomfited+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
disconcert+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
disconcerted+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
discourage+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
discouraged+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
dishearten+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
disheartened+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
dislike+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
dislike+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
dismay+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
dismayed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
disorient+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
disoriented+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
displease+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
displeased+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
distress+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
distressed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
dread+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
dread+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
ecstatic+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
elate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
elated+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
embarrass+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
embarrassed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
embitter+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
embittered+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
empathetic+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
empathise+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
empathize+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
empathy+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
enjoy+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
enjoyment+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
enrage+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
enraged+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
envy+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
envy+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
exasperate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
exasperated+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
exhilarate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
exhilarated+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
fascinate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
fascinated+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
fear+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
fear+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
fed-up+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
feed-up+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
feel+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
frighten+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
frightened+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
glee+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
gleeful+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
glimpse+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
gratified+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
gratify+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
grief+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
grief-stricken+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
grieve+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
hanker+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
hate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
hatred+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
hear+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
heartbroken+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
horrified+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
horrify+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
indignant+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
infuriate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
infuriated+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
irate+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
irk+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
irked+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
jubilant+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
listen+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
loathe+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
loathing+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
love+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
luxuriate+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
mortified+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
mortify+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
mourn+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
mournful+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
mourning+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
mystified+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
mystify+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
nervous+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
notice+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
offend+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
offended+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
overjoy+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
overjoyed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
peeve+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
peeved+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
perplex+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
perplexed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
perturb+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
perturbed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
pine+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
pity+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
pity+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
please+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
pleased+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
rattle+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
rattled+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
regard+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
regret+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
regret+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
relax+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
relaxed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
relish+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
relish+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
resent+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
resentful+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
resentment+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
revolt+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
revolted+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
rue+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
rueful+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
sad+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
sadden+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
saddened+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
savour+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
scare+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
scared+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
scrutinize+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
see+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
sense+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
shiver+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
shock+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
shocked+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
sicken+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
sickened+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
smell+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
sorrowful+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
startle+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
startled+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
stress+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
stressed+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
stupefied+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
stupefy+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
sympathetic+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
sympathise+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
sympathize+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
sympathy+Noun^^+f_exper_subj		#;
taste+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
terrified+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
terrify+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
terror-stricken+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
thrill+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
thrilled+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
torment+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
tormented+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
traumatise+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
traumatised+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
unsettle+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
unsettled+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
unsympathetic+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
want+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
worried+Adj^^+f_exper_subj		#;
worry+Verb^^+f_exper_subj+f_partpas		#;
yearn+Verb^^+f_exper_subj		#;
